Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3439
Replacement certificates; fee.

The board may issue a new certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization to replace any lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificate. A fee not to exceed one hundred dollars shall be charged for each such issuance.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 39.